Missouri, session 2026, HB2727.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 571.020, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 571.020, to read as follows:
571.020. 1. A person commits an offense if such person knowingly possesses,
manufactures, transports, repairs, or sells:
(1) An explosive weapon;
(2) An explosive, incendiary, or poison substance or material with the purpose to
possess, manufacture, or sell an explosive weapon;
(3) A gas gun;
(4) A bullet or projectile which explodes or detonates upon impact because of an
independent explosive charge after having been shot from a firearm; [or]
(5) Knuckles;
(6) A high-capacity magazine, which shall mean a magazine, belt, drum, feed
strip, or similar device that has a capacity of, or that can be readily restored or
converted to accept, more than ten rounds of ammunition; or
[(6)] (7) Any of the following in violation of federal law:
(a) A machine gun;
(b) A short-barreled rifle or shotgun;
(c) A firearm silencer; or
(d) A switchblade knife.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2727 2
2. A person does not commit an offense pursuant to this section if his or her conduct
involved any of the items in subdivisions (1) to [(5)] (6) of subsection 1 of this section, the
item was possessed in conformity with any applicable federal law, and the conduct:
(1) Was incident to the performance of official duty by the Armed Forces of the
United States, National Guard, a governmental law enforcement agency, or a penal
institution; [or]
(2) Was incident to engaging in a lawful commercial or business transaction with an
organization enumerated in subdivision (1) of this [section] subsection; [or]
(3) Was incident to using an explosive weapon in a manner reasonably related to a
lawful industrial or commercial enterprise; [or]
(4) Was incident to displaying the weapon in a public museum or exhibition; or
(5) Was incident to using the weapon in a manner reasonably related to a lawful
dramatic performance.
3. An offense pursuant to subdivision (1), (2), (3) [or], (6), or (7) of subsection 1 of
this section is a class D felony; a crime pursuant to subdivision (4) or (5) of subsection 1 of
this section is a class A misdemeanor.
✔